California, session 20252026, SB1266.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 487j of the Penal Code is amended to read:487j. (a) Every person who steals, takes, or carries away copper materials of another, including, but not limited to, copper wire, copper cable, copper tubing, and copper piping, which are of a value exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) is guilty of grand theft. Grand theft of copper shall be punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).(b) For purposes of this section, ”value” instead of using fair market scrap value, “value” shall be calculated as the full cost to the victim to repair and replace the stolen materials, including labor and equipment, rather than the fair market scrap value. equipment that was damaged or destroyed by the stealing, taking, or carrying away. “Value” shall not include the cost of labor.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.